Tennessee, session 114, SB1709.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 5, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) This section is known and may be cited as the "Tennessee Civics Education
Act."
(b) Beginning July 1, 2027, a person seeking the first issuance of a practitioner
teacher license or practitioner occupational teacher license must achieve a passing
score on the United States civics test described in subdivision (c)(1) in order to obtain
the license.
(c) The department of education shall:
(1) Prepare a United States civics test composed of one hundred (100)
questions collected from the questions that are set forth within the civics test
administered by the United States citizenship and immigration services to
persons seeking to become naturalized citizens;
SB1709
011191
- 1 -

(2) Beginning January 1, 2027, administer the United States civics test
described in subdivision (c)(1) to persons seeking the first issuance of a
practitioner teacher license or practitioner occupational teacher license; and
(3) Provide a person who achieves a passing score on the United States
civics test described in subdivision (c)(1) with a certificate of completion.
(d) A person must correctly answer at least seventy (70) questions to receive a
passing score on the United States civics test described in subdivision (c)(1).
(e) The department shall not provide persons seeking the first issuance of a
practitioner teacher license or practitioner occupational teacher license with any
remediation or civics instruction in preparation for the United States civics test described
in subdivision (c)(1); provided, that the department shall provide links on its website to
reference materials and instructional resources the department deems appropriate or
helpful to such persons in preparation for the test.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 011191